Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Adoption of Adult

405.140.
Definitions for KRS 405.140 to 405.240. [Repealed.]

405.150.
Adoption, when authorized; petition for adoption; parties defendant. [Repealed.]

405.160.
Filing petition; investigation by Department of Welfare; hearing. [Repealed.]

405.170.
Consent required for adoption. [Repealed.]

405.180.
Order of adoption. [Repealed.]

405.190.
Report of county clerk in Division of Vital Statistics; new record of birth. [Repealed.]

405.200.
Descent and distribution; relation of child to natural and adopted parents. [Repealed.]

405.210.
Adoption records confidential. [Repealed.]

405.220.
Appeal to circuit court. [Repealed.]

405.230.
Appeal bond; no costs against child appealing. [Repealed.]

405.240.
Unlawful to advertise for adoption. [Repealed.]

405.250.
Definitions for KRS 405.260 to 405.380. [Repealed.]

405.260.
Petition for adoption; who may file; where filed; joinder of husband and wife; who may be adopted; successive adoptions; child must live with petitioners. [Repealed.]

405.270.
Parties defendant; process; relinquishment of parental rights. [Repealed.]

405.280.
Verification of petition; what petition to allege; what to be filed with petition. [Repealed.]

405.290.
Department of Welfare to be given copy of petition and notice of hearing; investigation and report by department. [Repealed.]

405.300.
Consent, who must give; guardian ad litem; when required. [Repealed.]

405.310.
Personal attendance at hearing, in chambers. [Repealed.]

405.320.
Judgment of adoption; disposition of child if adoption not adjudged. [Repealed.]

405.330.
Appeal. [Repealed.]

405.340.
Legal status of adopted child; relation to natural parents. [Repealed.]

405.350.
Adoption records to be confidential; changes in records. [Repealed.]

405.360.
Completion of proceedings begun under former statutes. [Repealed.]

405.370.
Placing of child for adoption without consent of Department of Welfare forbidden. [Repealed.]

405.380.
Advertisements soliciting children for adoption forbidden. [Repealed.]

405.390.
Adoption of an adult.

An adult person over eighteen (18) years of age may be adopted in the same manner as provided by law for the adoption of a child and with the same legal effect, except that his consent alone to such adoption shall be required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 120; 1964, ch. 21, § 6.